Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.181

Sale of adulterated or misbranded milk or milk products prohibited—Possession restricted.

No person shall produce, sell, offer, or expose for sale, or have in possession with intent to sell, any milk or milk product which is adulterated or misbranded. It is unlawful for any person, elsewhere than in a private home, to have in possession any adulterated or misbranded milk or milk products.

Adulterated or misbranded milk or milk products may be impounded and disposed of by the director.

[ 1999 c 291 s 10; 1994 c 143 s 302; 1961 c 11 s 15.36.070. Prior: 1949 c 168 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6266-31. Formerly RCW 15.36.070.]